Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB961.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3510(b) and (c)(2) of Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 3510(B), (C)(2), (H)(1), (2) AND (3) AND THE DEFINITIONS OF "OWNER," "PERMITTEE" AND "RUN-OF-THE-RIVER DAM" IN SUBSECTION (I) OF TITLE 30 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED, SUBSECTION (H) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:§ 3510. Marking of dams.* * *(b) Existing dams.--[(1) The department shall compile and maintain a current <--<--123456789101112131415161718 list of existing dams on the waters of this Commonwealth that the department determines to be run-of-the-river type dams. Within three months of the effective date of this section, the department shall notify the permittees and owners of those run-of-the-river dams of the requirements of this section by certified letter. Within six months of receiving notification of the requirements of this section from the department, the permittees and owners of run-of-the-river dams shall comply with the requirements of this section to mark the areas above and below their dams and on the banks immediately adjacent to their dams during the time periods of the year required by the commission with signs and buoys of a design and content determined by the commission to warn the swimming, fishing and boating public of the hazards posed by the dam.](1.1) The department shall compile and maintain a CURRENT list of existing dams on the waters of this Commonwealth that are run-of-the-river dams. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE COMMISSION WITH IDENTIFYING INFORMATION ABOUT THE PERMITTEE OR OWNER, LOCATION, SIZE AND SPECIFICATIONS OF THE RUN-OF-THE-RIVER DAMS ANNUALLY, UNLESS OTHERWISE REQUESTED BY THE COMMISSION. The following shall apply:(i) Within three months of the discovery of a run-of-the river dam not already inventoried by the department, the department shall notify the permittees and owners of the dam of the requirements of this section in writing.(ii) Within six months of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall notify the permittees and 20250HB0961PN2619 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owners of each of the run-of-the-river dam of the requirements of this section in writing.(iii) (II) Within six months of receiving notification of the requirements of this section from the department, the permittees and owners of run-of-the-river dams shall comply with the requirements of this section to mark the areas above and below the dams and on the banks immediately adjacent to the dams during the time periods of the year required by the commission with signs and buoys of a design and content determined by the commission to warn the swimming, fishing and boating public of the hazards posed by the dam.(2) If the permittee or owner of a run-of-the-river dam disagrees [with the determination of the department,] that the dam meets the definition of "run-of-the-river dam," the permittee or owner [shall file written notice with the Environmental Hearing Board] may appeal the action to the Environmental Hearing Board under section 4 of the act of July 13, 1988 (P.L.530, No.94), known as the Environmental Hearing Board Act, and 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 (relating to practice and procedure) within 30 days of receiving the determination. The Environmental Hearing Board shall reach a decision as soon as practicable. If the decision of the board upholds the determination of the department, the permittee or owner filing [such] the notice shall have [six] THREE months to comply with this section following the decision.(b.1) Public information.--Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the following information shall be published on the department's AND COMMISSION'S publicly accessible Internet website WEBSITES : 20250HB0961PN2619 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The list compiled and maintained by the department under subsection (b).(2) A map of this Commonwealth, developed by the department, that shows the locations of all run-of-the-river dams known to the department within this Commonwealth.(c) Maintenance of signs and buoys.--* * *(2) When a permittee or owner learns that signs or buoys installed under this section have been removed or defaced by an act of God or the acts or omissions of third parties other than the permittee or owner [or [his] the permittee's or owner's agent, [he], the permittee or owner shall repair or replace the signs or buoys within [30] 15 days unless [river] AN EXTENSION IS REQUESTED BY THE PERMITTEE OR OWNER AND GRANTED BY THE COMMISSION AS A RESULT OF conditions during that time make such repair or replacement dangerous to undertake or impracticable to effect, in which case the permittee or owner shall repair or replace the signs or buoys as soon as is reasonably practicable. If a permittee [or owner or [his] the permittee's or owner's agent] removes any signs or buoys, [he] the permittee or owner shall have five days thereafter to repair or replace the signs or buoys.* * *(H) PENALTIES.--(1) ANY PERSON WHO FAILS TO COMPLY WITH SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) COMMITS A SUMMARY OFFENSE OF THE FIRST DEGREE FOR THE FIRST OFFENSE REGARDLESS OF ADJUDICATION AND A MISDEMEANOR OF THE THIRD DEGREE FOR A SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE. EACH [MONTH] 15-DAY PERIOD OF NONCOMPLIANCE SHALL CONSTITUTE A SEPARATE VIOLATION.20250HB0961PN2619 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) ANY PERSON WHO FAILS TO COMPLY WITH SUBSECTION (C) OR (D) COMMITS A SUMMARY OFFENSE OF THE SECOND DEGREE FOR THE FIRST OFFENSE REGARDLESS OF ADJUDICATION AND A SUMMARY OFFENSE OF THE FIRST DEGREE FOR A SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE. EACH [MONTH] 15-DAY PERIOD OF NONCOMPLIANCE SHALL CONSTITUTE A SEPARATE VIOLATION.(2.1) ANY PERSON WHO FAILS TO COMPLY WITH SUBSECTION (G) COMMITS A SUMMARY OFFENSE OF THE THIRD DEGREE.(3) ANY PERSON WHO ENTERS AN EXCLUSION ZONE MARKED UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION COMMITS A SUMMARY OFFENSE OF THE THIRD DEGREE PROVIDED THAT IT SHALL NOT BE A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION FOR THE PERMITTEE OR OWNER [AND HIS AGENTS] AND OFFICERS OF THE COMMONWEALTH AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO ENTER THE EXCLUSION ZONE FOR PURPOSES OF MAINTAINING THE DAMS AND SIGNS AND BUOYS OR FOR ENFORCEMENT AND RESCUE PURPOSES.* * *(I) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION:* * *"OWNER." THE PERSON WHO OWNS, CONTROLS, OPERATES, MAINTAINS OR MANAGES A RUN-OF-THE-RIVER DAM REGULATED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION PURSUANT TO THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 26, 1978 (P.L.1375, NO.325), KNOWN AS THE DAM SAFETY AND ENCROACHMENTS ACT.* * *"PERMITTEE." THE PERSON WHO HAS BEEN ISSUED A PERMIT BY THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION TO CONSTRUCT, OPERATE OR MAINTAIN A RUN-OF-THE-RIVER DAM[.] REGULATED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION PURSUANT TO THE DAM SAFETY AND 20250HB0961PN2619 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ENCROACHMENTS ACT."RUN-OF-THE-RIVER DAM." A MANMADE STRUCTURE WHICH:(1) IS A DAM REGULATED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION PURSUANT TO THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 26, 1978 (P.L.1375, NO.325), KNOWN AS THE DAM SAFETY AND ENCROACHMENTS ACT;(2) IS BUILT ACROSS OR PARTIALLY ACROSS A WATERCOURSE AND CERTAIN FLOWS PASS OVER THE [ENTIRE] DAM STRUCTURE, EXCLUDING ABUTMENTS, TO A NATURAL CHANNEL DOWNSTREAM; AND(3) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION, DETERMINES TO HAVE HYDRAULIC CHARACTERISTICS SUCH THAT AT CERTAIN FLOWS PERSONS MAY BE CAUGHT IN THE HYDRAULIC ROLLER OR BOIL IMMEDIATELY BELOW THE DAM.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0961PN2619 - 6 - 1234567891011121314